Washington statutes.
RCW 15.44.140

Authority to inspect premises and records—Subpoenas.

(1) The commission through its agents may inspect the premises and records of any carrier, handler, dealer, manufacturer, processor, or distributor of dairy products for the purpose of enforcing this chapter.

(2) The commission has the authority to issue subpoenas for the production of books, records, documents, and other writings of any kind for any carrier, handler, dealer, manufacturer, processor, or distributor of dairy products for the purpose of enforcing this chapter.

[ 2002 c 313 s 98; 1961 c 11 s 15.44.140. Prior: 1939 c 219 s 19; RRS s 6266-19.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.